California statutes. Water Code
The department shall keep a separate account for money appropriated for the purposes of this chapter from the General Fund. The money in this account shall be available to the department for expenditure for the maintenance and operation of any unit for which a maintenance area is formed to the extent there is no money, or insufficient money, available under Section 12878.42. All money so expended shall be repaid from any money subsequently deposited by the benefited maintenance area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1800.)
-------------------------------------------

12878.44.

Money expended upon any unit during any fiscal year shall not exceed by more than 20 percent the amount of the estimate for that unit for that fiscal year, unless the department determines that expenditures that exceed that amount are necessary for emergency repairs or flood fighting. If in any fiscal year more money will be expended upon a unit than is, or will be, available from assessments or collections thereon derived from the maintenance area, the estimated amount of the deficit shall be added to the estimate for that unit for the following fiscal years, and if less money will be expended than collected, the estimated amount of that excess shall be deducted from the estimate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 230, Sec. 36.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

12878.45.

The State Controller shall have no responsibility for verifying the correctness of the claim as to the account upon which it is drawn, and the State Controller shall keep no separate accounts for the maintenance areas under this chapter within the Water Resources Revolving Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1800.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.7. Water Conservation Bond Law of 1988 [12879. - 12879.17.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [12879. - 12879.2.]

12879.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Water Conservation Bond Law of 1988.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 46, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 82 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

12879.1.

The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(a) There is a lack of local water projects in certain areas of the state where the demands of a growing population could exceed water supplies which could threaten the public health and impede economic and social growth.

(b) It is in the interest of the state to provide financial assistance to local agencies for the development of local water resources necessary to meet requirements for domestic, agricultural, and other uses.

(c) The participation of the state and the State Water Resources Development System in the construction and operation of local water projects in those areas is desirable to further the development, control, and conservation of the water resources of the state.

(d) Voluntary, cost-effective capital outlay water conservation programs can help meet growing demand for clean and abundant water supplies.

(e) Recharging groundwater basins is an effective way to maximize the availability of scarce water supplies throughout the state through the efficient management of recharge and extraction activities in groundwater basins, and by reversing the effects of historical overdraft.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 46, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 82 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

12879.2.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Committee” means the Water Conservation Finance Committee created pursuant to Section 12879.9.

(b) “Department” means the Department of Water Resources.

(c) “Fund” means the 1988 Water Conservation Fund created pursuant to Section 12879.3.

(d) “Local agency” means any city, county, city and county, district, joint powers authority, or other political subdivision of the state involved in water management.

(e) “Eligible project” means any dam, reservoir, or other construction or improvement by a local agency for the diversion, storage, or primary distribution of water, or facilities for groundwater extraction, primarily for domestic, municipal, agricultural, industrial, recreation, fish and wildlife enhancement, flood control, or power production purposes. “Eligible project” also means any reservoir, pipeline, or other construction or improvement by a local agency for the storage or distribution of reclaimed water for reuse.

(f) (1) “Groundwater recharge facilities” means land and facilities for artificial groundwater recharge through methods that include, but are not limited to, either percolation using basins, pits, ditches, and furrows, modified streambed, flooding, and well injection, or in-lieu recharge. “Groundwater recharge facilities” also means capital outlay expenditures to expand, renovate, or restructure land and facilities already in use for the purpose of groundwater recharge.

(2) Groundwater recharge facilities may include either of the following:

(A) Instream facilities for regulation of water levels, but not regulation of streamflow by storage to accomplish diversion from the waterway.

(B) Conveyance facilities to the recharge site, including devices for flow regulation and measurement of recharge waters.

(3) Any part or all of the project facilities, including land under the facilities, may consist of separable features, or an appropriate share of multipurpose features of a larger system, or both.

(g) “In-lieu recharge” means accomplishing increased storage of groundwater by providing surface water to a user who relies on groundwater as a primary supply, in order to accomplish groundwater storage through the direct use of that surface water in lieu of pumping groundwater. In-lieu recharge shall be used rather than continuing pumping while artificially recharging with surface waters. However, bond proceeds shall not be used to purchase surface waters for use in lieu of pumping groundwater.

(h) “Voluntary cost-effective capital outlay water conservation programs” means those feasible capital outlay measures to improve the efficiency of water use through benefits that exceed their costs. The programs include, but are not limited to, lining or piping of ditches; improvements in water distribution system controls such as automated canal control, construction of small reservoirs within distribution systems that conserve water that already has been captured for reuse, and related physical improvements; tailwater pumpback recovery systems to reduce leakage; and capital changes in on-farm irrigation systems that improve irrigation efficiency, such as sprinkler or subsurface drip systems. In each case, the department shall determine that there is a net savings of water as a result of each proposed project and that the project is cost-effective.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 673.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Note: This section, as proposed to be added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 46, was amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 297, and approved (in amended form) in Prop. 82 on Nov. 8, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Water Conservation Program [12879.3. - 12879.6.]

12879.3.

(a) The proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the 1988 Water Conservation Fund, which is hereby created. A Local Water Projects Assistance Account shall be established in the fund for the purpose of implementing Section 12879.5, and a Water Conservation and Groundwater Recharge Account shall be established in the fund for the purposes of implementing Section 12879.6.

(b) From time to time, the department may modify existing accounts in the fund, or may establish other accounts in the fund, and in all other bond funds administered by the department, which the department determines are appropriate or necessary for proper administration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 46, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 82 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

12879.4.

(a) The department may make loans to local agencies, upon approval of the Legislature by statute, to aid in the construction of eligible projects and to aid in the funding of voluntary, cost-effective capital outlay water conservation programs and groundwater recharge facilities, and may adopt rules and regulations necessary to carry out this chapter.

Notwithstanding any provision of law, existing rules and regulations adopted by the department pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 12880) and Chapter 6.1 (commencing with Section 13450) that are in effect on the effective date of this chapter may be utilized to carry out this chapter. The department may subsequently revise those rules and regulations pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code as necessary to carry out this chapter.

(b) For the purpose of administering this chapter, the total expenditures of the department through the making of any loans may not exceed 5 percent of the total amount of the bonds authorized to be issued under this chapter. The department shall establish a reasonable schedule of administrative fees for loans, which fees shall be paid by the local agency pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 12879.4 to reimburse the state for the costs of state administration of this chapter.

Charges incurred by the Attorney General in protecting the interests of the state in the use and repayment of funds under this chapter shall be paid from the proceeds of bonds authorized to be issued under this chapter. These charges shall not be paid from funds allocated for administrative purposes, but shall be treated as a program expense, not to exceed 1.5 percent of the total amount of the bonds authorized to be issued under this chapter.

(c) Any contract entered into pursuant to this section may include such provisions as may be determined by the department, provided that any contract concerning an eligible project shall include, in substance, all of the following provisions:

(1) A finding by the department that the local agency has the ability to repay the loan, that the eligible project is economically justified, and that the eligible project is feasible from an engineering and geologic standpoint.

(2) An estimate of the reasonable cost and benefit of the eligible project, program, or facility.

(3) An agreement by the local agency to proceed expeditiously with, and complete, the eligible project.

(4) A provision that there shall be no moratorium or deferment on payments of principal or interest.

(5) Local agencies seeking a loan shall demonstrate, to the satisfaction of the department, that an adequate opportunity for public participation regarding the loan has been provided.

(6) Any election held with respect to the loan shall include the entire local agency except where the agency proposes to accept the loan on behalf of a specified portion, or portions, of the agency, in which case the election shall be held in that portion or portions of the agency only.

(7) Annual principal and interest payments shall commence not later than one year after completion of any project and all loans shall be fully amortized not later than 50 years after project completion.

(8) The recipient of a loan shall establish a dedicated source of revenue for repayment of the loan.

(9) Any loans made pursuant to this chapter may be for a period of up to 20 years. The interest rate for the loans made for projects to be funded pursuant to Section 12879.5 shall be set at a rate equal to the interest rate paid by the state on the most recent sale of state general obligation bonds, with that rate to be computed according to the true interest cost method. The interest rate for loans made for projects to be funded pursuant to Section 12879.6 shall be set at a rate equal to 50 percent of the interest rate paid by the state on the most recent sale of state general obligation bonds, with that rate to be computed according to the true interest cost method. When the interest rate so determined is not a multiple of one-tenth of 1 percent, the interest rate shall be set at the next higher multiple of one-tenth of 1 percent. The interest rate set for each contract shall be applied throughout the repayment period of the contract. There shall be a level annual repayment of principal and interest on the loans. The amount of the principal shall include the administrative fee described in subdivision (b).

(d) All loans made pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to the approval of the Legislature by statute.

(e) Applications for loans or financial participation by the state under this chapter shall be made to the department in the form and with the supporting material as may be prescribed by the department.

(f) All money repaid to the state pursuant to any contract executed under this chapter, or under Section 13999.11, shall be deposited in the General Fund as reimbursement for payment of principal and interest on bonds authorized to be issued under this chapter or Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 13999) that have been paid from the General Fund.

(g) As approved annually by the Legislature in the Budget Act, the department, notwithstanding subdivision (b), may expend money repaid to the state pursuant to any contract executed pursuant to this chapter as necessary for the administration of contracts entered into by the department pursuant to this chapter. However, the expenditures may not in any year exceed 1.5 percent of the amount repaid to the state in that year. Charges incurred by the Attorney General in protecting the state’s interests in the use and repayment of funds pursuant to this chapter may be paid by the department from these funds. However, the charges may not exceed 0.5 percent of the amount repaid to the state in that year. Any of the foregoing sums approved by the Legislature in the Budget Act but unencumbered at the end of any year shall automatically revert to the General Fund.

(History: Amended (as proposed to be added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 46) by Stats. 1988, Ch. 297, Sec. 2.   Approved (in amended form) in Proposition 82 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

12879.5.

(a) The sum of twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) of the money in the fund shall be deposited in the Local Water Projects Assistance Account and shall be available for loans to local agencies to aid in the construction of eligible projects.

(b) No eligible project may receive more than five million dollars ($5,000,000) in loans from the department.

(c) In the administration of this section, the department and the California Water Commission shall give preference to projects involving the development of new basic water supplies which may include the enlargement of existing dams and reservoirs, and for projects that will remedy existing water supply problems. The department and the California Water Commission shall set priority for loans pursuant to this section on the basis of the cost-effectiveness of the proposed project, with the most cost-effective projects receiving highest priority.

(d) If the water supply function of a dam and reservoir facility is operationally limited or eliminated for dam safety purposes, pursuant to Part 1 (commencing with Section 6000) of Division 3, the department and the California Water Commission may give consideration to projects which would rehabilitate the dam and reservoir for water supply purposes. The rehabilitation of facilities may include comparable replacement facilities.

(e) The department shall not make loans pursuant to this section for otherwise eligible projects whose benefits are more than 50 percent derived from hydroelectric generation, as determined by the department.

(f) The department may make loans to local agencies, at the interest rates authorized pursuant to this chapter and pursuant to any terms and conditions as may be determined necessary by the department, for the purposes of financing feasibility studies of projects potentially eligible for funding pursuant to this section. No single potential project shall be eligible to receive more than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), and not more than 10 percent of the total amount of bonds authorized to be expended for purposes of this section may be expended for those purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 745, Sec. 230.9.   Effective October 12, 2001.   Note: This section, as proposed to be added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 46, was amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 297, and approved (in amended form) in Prop. 82 on Nov. 8, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

12879.6.

(a) The sum of forty million dollars ($40,000,000) of the money in the fund shall be deposited in the Water Conservation and Groundwater Recharge Account and shall be available for appropriation by the Legislature for loans to local agencies to aid in the acquisition and construction of voluntary, cost-effective capital outlay water conservation programs and groundwater recharge facilities.

(b) No eligible project may receive more than five million dollars ($5,000,000) in loans from the department.

(c) The department shall set priority for loans under this section for voluntary, cost-effective capital outlay water conservation programs on the basis of the cost effectiveness of the proposed project, with the most cost-effective projects receiving the highest priority.

(d) The department shall set priority for loans under this section for groundwater recharge facilities for projects in overdrafted groundwater basins and those projects in critical need, for projects whose feasibility studies show the greatest economic justification and the greatest engineering and hydrogeologic feasibility, as determined by the department, and for projects located in areas which have existing water management programs.

(e) The department may make loans to local agencies, at the interest rates authorized pursuant to this chapter and under any terms and conditions as may be determined necessary by the department, for the purposes of financing feasibility studies of projects potentially eligible for funding pursuant to this section. No single potential project shall be eligible to receive more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), and not more than 3 percent of the total amount of bonds authorized to be expended for the purposes of this section may be expended for these purposes.

(History: Amended (as proposed to be added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 46) by Stats. 1988, Ch. 297, Sec. 4.   Approved (in amended form) in Proposition 82 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Fiscal Provisions [12879.7. - 12879.17.]

12879.7.

Bonds in the total amount of fifty-four million seven hundred sixty-five thousand dollars ($54,765,000), exclusive of refunding bonds issued pursuant to Section 12879.15, or so much thereof as is necessary, may be issued and sold to provide a fund to be used for carrying out the purposes expressed in this chapter and to be used to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code. All bonds herein authorized, which have been duly sold and delivered as herein provided, shall constitute valid and legally binding general obligations of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both principal and interest thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 18, Sec. 8.   (AB 92)   Effective June 29, 2020.   Note: Approved in Proposition 82 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

12879.8.

The bonds authorized by this chapter shall be prepared, executed, issued, sold, paid, and redeemed as provided in the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and all of the provisions of that law apply to the bonds and to this chapter and are hereby incorporated in this chapter as though set forth in full in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 46, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 82 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

12879.9.

(a) Solely for the purpose of authorizing the issuance and sale, pursuant to the State General Obligation Bond Law, of the bonds authorized by this chapter, the Water Conservation Finance Committee is hereby created. For purposes of this chapter, the Water Conservation Finance Committee is “the committee” as that term is used in the State General Obligation Bond Law. The committee consists of the Governor, the Controller, the Treasurer, the Director of Finance, the Director of Water Resources, and the Chairperson of the California Water Commission, or their designated representatives. A majority of the committee may act for the committee.

(b) For purposes of the State General Obligation Bond Law, the Department of Water Resources is designated the “board.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 46, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 82 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

12879.10.

The committee shall determine whether or not it is necessary or desirable to issue bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter in order to carry out the actions specified in Sections 12879.5 and 12879.6, and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out those actions progressively, and it is not necessary that all of the bonds authorized to be issued be sold at any one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 46, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 82 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

12879.11.

There shall be collected each year and in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, a sum in an amount required to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds maturing each year, and all officers required by law to perform any duty in regard to the collection of state revenues shall collect that additional sum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 46, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 82 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

12879.12.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, there is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury, for the purposes of this chapter, an amount that will equal the total of the following:

(a) The sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and interest on, bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter, as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) The sum which is necessary to carry out the provisions of Section 12879.13, appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 46, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 82 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

12879.13.

For the purposes of carrying out this chapter, the Director of Finance may, by executive order, authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount or amounts not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which the committee has, by resolution, authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. Any amounts withdrawn shall be deposited in the fund to be allocated by the board in accordance with this chapter. Any money made available under this section to the board from money received from the sale of bonds for the purpose of carrying out this chapter shall be returned to the General Fund plus the interest that the amount would have earned in the Pooled Money Investment Account.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 46, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12879.135.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this bond act, or of the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), if the Treasurer sells bonds pursuant to this bond act that include a bond counsel opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is excluded from gross income for federal tax purposes under designated conditions, the Treasurer may maintain separate accounts for the bond proceeds invested and the investment earnings on those proceeds, and may use or direct the use of those proceeds or earnings to pay any rebate, penalty, or other payment required under federal law, or take any other action with respect to the investment and use of those bond proceeds, as may be required or desirable under federal law in order to maintain the tax-exempt status of those bonds and to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 652, Sec. 28.   Approved in Proposition 82 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

12879.14.

All money deposited in the fund which is derived from premium and accrued interest on bonds sold shall be reserved in the fund and shall be available for transfer to the General Fund as a credit to expenditures for bond interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 46, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 82 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

12879.15.

Any bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter may be refunded by the issuance of refunding bonds in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 16780) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 2 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Approval by the electors of the state for the issuance of these bonds shall include the approval of any bonds issued to refund any bonds originally issued or previously issued refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 46, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 82 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

12879.16.

The board may request the Pooled Money Investment Board to make a loan from the Pooled Money Investment Account, in accordance with Section 16312 of the Government Code, for the purposes of carrying out this chapter. The amount of the request shall not exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which the committee has by resolution authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. The board shall execute such documents as are required by the Pooled Money Investment Board to obtain and repay the loan. Any amounts loaned shall be deposited in the fund to be allocated by the board in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 46, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 82 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

12879.17.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that, inasmuch as the proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this chapter are not “proceeds of taxes” as that term is used in Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, the disbursement of these proceeds is not subject to the limitations imposed by that article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 46, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 82 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. State Financial Assistance for Local Projects [12880. - 12893.]



  ARTICLE 1. Short Title [12880. - 12880.]

12880.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Davis-Grunsky Act.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 27.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [12881. - 12881.4.]

12881.

In furtherance of the development, control and conservation of the water resources of the state and the State Water Resources Development System it is the policy of the state to provide financial assistance to public agencies for the construction of water projects to meet local requirements in which there is a statewide interest by making grants or loans, or both, and by participating in the construction and operation of water projects, and also to provide financial assistance to public agencies for the preparation of certain feasibility reports on such water projects by making loans, in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 27.)
-------------------------------------------

12881.2.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Project” means any dam, reservoir, or other construction or improvement by a public agency for the diversion, storage, or distribution of water primarily for domestic, municipal, agricultural, industrial, recreation, fish and wildlife enhancement, flood control, or power production purposes.

(b) “Public agency” means any city, county, district or other political subdivision of the state.

(c) “Feasibility report” means such report on the feasibility of a public agency’s proposed project as the department may require the public agency to file with the department in support of an application by the public agency under this chapter for a loan for the construction of the proposed project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 301.)
-------------------------------------------

12881.4.

In the administration of this chapter, the department and the commission shall give preference to projects involving the development of new basic water supplies. The department and the commission may also give preference to projects involving the repair, alteration, or replacement of dam and reservoir facilities which are subject to storage restrictions for dam safety purposes pursuant to Part 1 (commencing with Section 6000) of Division 3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 650, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Procedure [12882. - 12882.5.]

12882.

Applications for loans or grants or financial participation by the state under this chapter shall be made to the department in such form and with such supporting material as may be prescribed by the department. Supporting material with respect to the ability of a public agency to repay the loan and to the reasonable ability to finance the proposed project from other sources may be supplied by the county assessor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 359.)
-------------------------------------------

12882.2.

Applications for loans for irrigation distribution system projects or municipal distribution system projects which involve extreme hardship which jeopardizes the public health, safety or welfare shall be made in the following manner:

The governing body of the public agency shall submit an application to the department describing, generally, such extreme hardship existing with respect to the water supply, the financial and economic conditions existing in the area, and the proposed project. The statements by the governing body shall be based upon, and the application shall be accompanied by:

(a) A report by the assessor of the local agency with respect to assessed valuations and tax delinquencies.

(b) A report by the engineer of the local agency (or if it has none, by the county surveyor or road commissioner) describing the project and estimating its cost, in general terms.

(c) In cases involving a health hazard with respect to the domestic water supply, a report by the local health officer or by the Department of Public Health with respect to such health hazard.

(d) Such other information as the department may require from the agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 27.)
-------------------------------------------

12882.3.

An application for a reservoir site loan pursuant to Section 12885.2 shall include:

(a) Evidence that the proposed site is zoned as a reservoir site.

(b) Geologic data as to the suitability of the site for reservoir construction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 301.)
-------------------------------------------

12882.4.

A copy of each application, except applications for loans for the preparation of proposed feasibility reports, shall be transmitted by the department to the Department of Parks and Recreation and to the Department of Fish and Game.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 711, Sec. 129.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

12882.5.

The report required by Section 12882.4 shall include a statement of the project’s onshore facilities and any other local facilities to be required by the department as a condition of the grant or loan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 359.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Qualifications Generally [12883. - 12883.4.]

12883.

A proposed project may be approved for assistance only if it is determined that the project substantially conforms to the California Water Plan, is engineeringly feasible, economically justified, and, if a loan is proposed, that there is reasonable assurance, commensurate with the need for the proposed project, that the public agency can repay it. The potential future growth and development of the area shall be taken into consideration in the calculation of the benefits for the determination of the economic justification of a proposed project. Such factors as the public health, safety, and welfare shall be taken into consideration in determining the need for a proposed project.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 27.)
-------------------------------------------

12883.2.

In the case of a grant for recreation or fish and wildlife enhancement, or both, the determination of economic justification of the proposed project may, in the department’s discretion, be limited to a determination of the economic justification of the recreation and fish and wildlife enhancement functions of the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 27.)
-------------------------------------------

12883.4.

A loan for the preparation of a proposed feasibility report on a proposed project may be approved only if it is determined that there is reasonable assurance that the public agency can repay the loan and only if the agency receives a favorable written reply from the department on a written request for a preliminary determination of eligibility for a loan for the construction of the proposed project filed with the department by the agency under the regulations of the department promulgated pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 27.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Grants [12884. - 12884.2.]

12884.

The department is authorized to make state grants to public agencies from moneys available for such purpose. Grants in excess of four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) for any one project for the purposes authorized by subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 12884.2 may be made by the department only upon specific approval of the Legislature, by an act enacted after the receipt of copies of the project report filed pursuant to Section 12882.4 and upon such additional terms and conditions as the Legislature may prescribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 359.)
-------------------------------------------

12884.2.

Grants in furtherance of a project that involves the development of a new water supply or a project that involves the repair, alteration, or replacement of dam and reservoir facilities which are subject to storage restrictions for dam safety purposes pursuant to Part 1 (commencing with Section 6000) of Division 3 may be made for the following purposes:

(a) For the part of the construction cost of the proposed project properly allocated to the enhancement of fish and wildlife, except, that a grant for that part shall not exceed 50 percent of the construction cost. In allocating the costs of repair, alteration, or replacement of a dam to fish and wildlife enhancement, the department may consider existing fish and wildlife resources to the extent that they would be reduced or eliminated by a storage restriction for dam safety purposes pursuant to Part 1 (commencing with Section 6000) of Division 3. 

(b) For the part of the construction cost of any dam and reservoir of the proposed project properly allocated to recreational functions of statewide interest, except that a grant for that part shall not exceed 50 percent of the construction cost, and provided further, that the total grant under subdivisions (a) and (b) for any one project shall not exceed 75 percent of the construction cost of the project. In allocating the costs of repair, alteration, or replacement of a dam, to recreational functions of statewide interest, the department may consider existing recreation, to the extent that it would be reduced or eliminated by a storage restriction for dam safety purposes pursuant to Part 1 (commencing with Section 6000) of Division 3. Those construction costs may include expenditures for lands located above the high waterline of reservoirs which are necessary or desirable for public recreation in connection with the reservoir.

(c) For the construction of initial water supply and sanitary facilities which are needed for public recreational use of each proposed dam and reservoir of the proposed project which will develop a new water supply. A grant for the purpose specified in this subdivision shall not be subject to the limitation contained in Section 12884 on grants for the purposes specified in subdivisions (a) and (b) and shall not be included in computing the total amount which may be granted to a public agency in connection with a project for those purposes. A grant for the purpose specified in this subdivision shall not exceed one-fourth of the total amount granted to a public agency in connection with a project for the purposes specified in subdivision (a) or (b), or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 650, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Loans [12885. - 12885.9.]

12885.

The department is authorized to make state loans to public agencies for the construction of projects from moneys available for such loans. Loans in excess of four million dollars ($4,000,000) for any one project may be made by the department only upon specific approval of the Legislature, by an act enacted after the receipt of copies of the project report filed pursuant to Section 12882. 4 and upon such additional terms and conditions as the Legislature may prescribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 359.)
-------------------------------------------

12885.1.

Loans may be made only for projects primarily for domestic, municipal, agricultural, industrial, recreation, or fish and wildlife enhancement purposes. Such loans may be made for all or any part of the construction cost of any such project but in no event shall any such loan be in an amount which is greater than the portion of the construction cost of the project which the department finds to be beyond the reasonable ability of the public agency to finance from other sources. Such loans shall be repayable over a period not to exceed 50 years. A period of development of not exceeding 10 years may be allowed in addition to such maximum 50-year repayment period, during which no payments on the principal of or the interest on such a loan shall be required, when in the department’s judgment such development period is justified under the circumstances. If the payment of interest is deferred pursuant to this section, no interest shall be charged on the interest amounts for which payment is deferred. The accrued interest may, at the option of the public agency, be paid in annual installments during the remainder of the loan repayment period.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 12885.2 by Stats. 1967, Ch. 179.)